Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB659.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 37COMBUSTIBLE GAS DETECTORSSec.3701. Scope of chapter.3702. Definitions.3703. Fuel gas detector required.3704. Residential rental units.3705. Transfer of building.3706. Noninterference.3707. Construction.3708. Enforcement.123456789101112131415161718 § 3701. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to combustible gas detectors.§ 3702. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Assembly occupancy." An assembly occupancy classification consistent with the provisions of the Uniform Construction Code."Business occupancy." The business occupancy classification consistent with the provisions of the Uniform Construction Code."Child care." Care in lieu of parental care given for part of the day to a child under 16 years of age away from the child's own home. The term does not include child care furnished in a place of worship during religious services."Child-care facility." Any of the following:(1) A premises in which child care is provided for a period exceeding 24 hours for a child under 16 years of age who is not a relative of the operator and is not accompanied by a parent, individual standing in loco parentis or legal guardian. The term does not include a premises selected for care of a child by a parent, loco parentis or legal guardian for a period of 30 days or less or a facility operated under social service auspices.(2) A premises in which child care is provided simultaneously for seven or more children who are not relatives of the operator, except a facility operated under social service auspices.(3) A home where child care is provided at any time to no less than four children and no more than six children who are not relatives of the caregiver.20250SB0659PN0698 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) A nursery school that is licensed and regulated by the Commonwealth."Dormitory." A building that contains one or more housing units owned or leased by an institution of higher education and is used as a residence by the students of that institution."Fuel gas detector." A device that meets all of the following requirements:(1) Has an assembly that incorporates a sensor control component and an alarm notification that detects elevations in propane, natural gas or any liquefied petroleum gas.(2) Sounds a warning alarm.(3) Is approved or listed for the purpose specified in paragraph (2) by a nationally recognized independent testing laboratory."Housing unit." A room or suite of two or more rooms occupied, leased for occupation or intended or designed to be occupied as a residence by the students of an institution of higher education."Install." To attach a fuel gas detector to a wall or ceiling and:(1) hard-wire the fuel gas detector into electrical wiring;(2) directly plug the fuel gas detector into an electrical outlet without a switch, other than a circuit breaker; or(3) if the fuel gas detector is battery-powered, place fully charged batteries into the fuel gas detector."Lodging establishment." As follows:(1) Any of the following:(i) A hotel, motel, inn, guest house or other 20250SB0659PN0698 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 structure held out by any means, including advertising, license, registration with an innkeepers' group, convention listing association, travel publication or similar association or with a government agency, as being available to provide overnight lodging or use of facility space for consideration to persons seeking temporary accommodation.(ii) A place that advertises beds, sanitary facilities or other space for a temporary period to members of the public at large.(iii) A place recognized as a hostelry.(2) The term includes any portion of a facility devoted to a person who pays consideration to occupy one or more units as an established permanent residence."Mercantile occupancy." The mercantile occupancy classification consistent with the provisions of the Uniform Construction Code."Multifamily dwelling." A house or building, or a portion of a house or building, intended or designed to be occupied or leased for occupation, or occupied as a home or residence for three or more households living and cooking in separate apartments."Residential building." Detached one-family and two-family dwellings and multiple single-family dwellings not more than three stories in height with a separate means of egress, including accessory structures."Uniform Construction Code." The Uniform Construction Code adopted at 34 Pa. Code § 403.21 (relating to uniform construction code) under the authority granted in the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania 20250SB0659PN0698 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Construction Code Act.§ 3703. Fuel gas detector required.(a) Duty of owner to install.--(1) An owner of any of the following buildings shall install, or cause to be installed, in accordance with the manufacturer's requirements, at least one approved fuel gas detector in every room containing an appliance fueled by propane, natural gas or any liquefied petroleum gas:(i) A residential building.(ii) A multifamily dwelling.(iii) A dormitory.(iv) A child-care facility.(v) A lodging establishment.(vi) A mixed-use occupancy building containing a dwelling unit.(2) Beginning January 1, 2026, an owner of a building with any of the following occupancy classifications shall install, or cause to be installed, in accordance with the manufacturer's requirements, at least one approved fuel gas detector in every room containing an appliance fueled by propane, natural gas or any liquefied petroleum gas:(i) Assembly occupancy.(ii) Business occupancy.(iii) Mercantile occupancy.(b) (Reserved).§ 3704. Residential rental units.(a) Duties of landlord.--A landlord of a residential unit occupied under the terms of a rental agreement or under a month-to-month tenancy shall:(1) Provide fuel gas detectors, if fuel gas detectors 20250SB0659PN0698 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 are not already present.(2) Maintain each fuel gas detector in working condition.(3) After notification, in writing, by the tenant of a deficiency in a fuel gas detector, repair or replace the fuel gas detector, if deficient.(b) Annual inspection.--The landlord shall conduct a yearly inspection of the fuel gas detector to ensure that it is in working condition and shall certify at the end of each inspection that a proper inspection occurred.(c) Limitations.--If the landlord complied with the duty to maintain the fuel detectors in accordance with this chapter and did not know or had not been notified of the need to repair or replace a fuel gas detector, the landlord's failure to repair or replace the fuel gas detector may not be considered evidence of negligence in a subsequent civil action arising from death, property loss or personal injury.(d) Duties of tenant.--(1) A tenant may not disconnect or disable a fuel gas detector in the unit occupied by the tenant from the electrical service in the building.(2) The tenant shall periodically test the fuel gas detectors in a battery-powered fuel gas detector.(3) The tenant shall promptly communicate any deficiency of the fuel detector to the landlord.§ 3705. Transfer of building.(a) Duties.--A person that, after January 1, 2026, acquires by sale or exchange a building listed in section 3703(a)(1) (relating to fuel gas detector required) shall:(1) Install fuel gas detectors in the building in 20250SB0659PN0698 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with section 3703 within 30 days of acquisition or occupancy of the building, whichever is later, if fuel gas detectors are not already present.(2) Certify at the closing of the transaction that fuel gas detectors will be installed.(b) Method of installation.--The person shall install a fuel gas detector in accordance with the manufacturer's requirements at the time of installation in each area containing an appliance fueled by propane, natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas.(c) Immunity.--A person may not have a claim for relief against a property owner, a property purchaser, an authorized agent of a property owner or purchaser, a person in possession of real property, a closing agent or a lender for any damages resulting from the operation, maintenance or effectiveness of a fuel gas detector.(d) Title unaffected by violation.--A violation of this section does not create a defect in title to the property.§ 3706. Noninterference.(a) Duties required.--A person may not knowingly interfere with or make inoperative a fuel gas detector required under this chapter.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) does not apply to an owner or agent of an owner of a building who temporarily disconnects a fuel gas detector in a dwelling unit or common area if:(1) The fuel gas detector is disconnected only for construction or rehabilitation activities when the activities are likely to activate the fuel gas detector or make it inactive.(2) The fuel gas detector is immediately reconnected at the cessation of construction or rehabilitation activities 20250SB0659PN0698 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each day, regardless of the intent to return to construction or rehabilitation activities on succeeding days.§ 3707. Construction.Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create a cause of action against an owner required to comply with section 3703 (relating to fuel gas detector required) or 3704 (relating to residential rental units) if the owner has conducted an inspection of the required fuel gas detectors immediately after installation and has reinspected the fuel gas detectors prior to occupancy by each new tenant, unless the owner was given at least 24 hours' actual notice of a defect or failure of the fuel gas detector to operate properly and failed to take action to correct the defect or failure.§ 3708. Enforcement.(a) Complaint.--A person that is aggrieved by a violation of this chapter may bring a civil action against an owner who fails to comply with this chapter.(b) Penalty.--An owner who violates this chapter shall be subject to a civil fine of not more than $500 for each violation. The court may waive any penalty or cost against a violator upon satisfactory proof that the violation was corrected within 10 days of the service of a complaint.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0659PN0698 - 8 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223